Massachusetts, session 194th, H3637.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 35PPP the following section:-
Section 35QQQ. (a) There shall be set upon the books of the commonwealth a separate
fund to be known as the Public Transportation Affordability Fund to be administered by the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation. There shall be credited to the fund: (i) amounts
collected pursuant to clause (v) of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of section 39 of chapter 63; (ii)
all revenues or other financing sources directed to the fund by appropriation, including revenues
collected pursuant to Article CXXI of the Massachusetts Constitution; and (iii) any income
derived from the investing of all amounts credited to the fund. Monies credited to the fund may
be expended by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation to the Massachusetts Bay
of 3

Transportation Authority established pursuant to section 2 of chapter 161A, and regional transit
authorities, established pursuant to section 3 of chapter 161B, without further appropriation, for
the purpose of funding free public transportation services.
(b) The department shall annually file a report with the governor, clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate and the joint committee on transportation detailing the activity of
the fund.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of section 39 of chapter 63 of the General
Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the words “or (iv) for tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2012, 8.0 per cent of its net income determined to be taxable in
accordance with this chapter” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (iv) for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2012, 8.0 per cent of its net income determined to be
taxable in accordance with this chapter; or (v) for tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2025, 8.75 per cent of its net income determined to be taxable in accordance with this chapter;
provided, however, that an amount equal to 0.75 per cent of the business corporation’s net
income determined to be taxable pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Public
Transportation Affordability Fund.
SECTION 3. Chapter 161A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following 2 sections:-
Section 53. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the authority shall
not collect a fare from riders for the use of bus transportation services.
of 3

Section 54. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the authority shall
not collect a fare from riders for the use of rapid transit, light rail or commuter rail transportation
services.
SECTION 4. Chapter 161B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 28. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no regional transit
authority shall collect a fare from riders for the use of bus transportation services.
of 3